Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Commission for the Blind, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,468,226 for operations  of
the commission.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,486,500 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Commission for
the Blind.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$16,530,578 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Commission for the
Blind.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5003 (HB 5003-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5003 (HB 5003-A) Page 2